Texas statutes.
CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

TITLE 1. CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

CHAPTER 8. SUPPRESSION OF RIOTS AND OTHER DISTURBANCES

Art. 8.01. OFFICER MAY REQUIRE AID. When any officer authorized to execute process is resisted, or when he has sufficient reason to believe that he will meet with resistance in executing the same, he may command as many of the citizens of his county as he may think proper; and the sheriff may call any military company in the county to aid him in overcoming the resistance, and if necessary, in seizing and arresting the persons engaged in such resistance.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Art. 8.02. MILITARY AID IN EXECUTING PROCESS. If it be represented to the Governor in such manner as to satisfy him that the power of the county is not sufficient to enable the sheriff to execute process, he may, on application, order any military company of volunteers or militia company from another county to aid in overcoming such resistance.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Art. 8.03. MILITARY AID IN SUPPRESSING RIOTS. Whenever, for the purpose of suppressing riots or unlawful assemblies, the aid of military or militia companies is called, they shall obey the orders of the civil officer who is engaged in suppressing the same.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Art. 8.04. DISPERSING RIOT. Whenever a number of persons are assembled together in such a manner as to constitute a riot, according to the penal law of the State, it is the duty of every magistrate or peace officer to cause such persons to disperse. This may either be done by commanding them to disperse or by arresting the persons engaged, if necessary, either with or without warrant.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Art. 8.05. OFFICER MAY CALL AID. In order to enable the officer to disperse a riot, he may call to his aid the power of the county in the same manner as is provided where it is necessary for the execution of process.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Art. 8.06. MEANS ADOPTED TO SUPPRESS. The officer engaged in suppressing a riot, and those who aid him are authorized and justified in adopting such measures as are necessary to suppress the riot, but are not authorized to use any greater degree of force than is requisite to accomplish that object.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Art. 8.07. UNLAWFUL ASSEMBLY. The Articles of this Chapter relating to the suppression of riots apply equally to an unlawful assembly and other unlawful disturbances, as defined by the Penal Code.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Art. 8.08. SUPPRESSION AT ELECTION. To suppress riots, unlawful assemblies and other disturbances at elections, any magistrate may appoint a sufficient number of special constables. Such appointments shall be made to each special constable, shall be in writing, dated and signed by the magistrate, and shall recite the purposes for which such appointment is made, and the length of time it is to continue. Before the same is delivered to such special constable, he shall take an oath before the magistrate to suppress, by lawful means, all riots, unlawful assemblies and breaches of the peace of which he may receive information, and to act impartially between all parties and persons interested in the result of the election.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Art. 8.09. POWER OF SPECIAL CONSTABLE. Special constables so appointed shall, during the time for which they are appointed, exercise the powers and perform the duties properly belonging to peace officers.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.